Illinois, session 104th, HB2635.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the School 5Board Member Recall Act. 6    Section 5. School board member recall elections.7    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 8contrary, school board members that were elected during a 9consolidated election may be recalled under this Act.10    (b) In order to recall a school board member under this 11Act, the organizer of the petitions of the recall must reside 12within the jurisdiction that the school board member 13represents and file with the local election authority 14petitions meeting the following signature requirements of 15voters registered in that jurisdiction supporting the recall: 16(i) signatures representing 25% of the votes cast in that 17jurisdiction in the last election for Governor or (ii) 10,000 18signatures of residents of the jurisdiction, whichever is 19less. 20    Before circulating petitions for a recall election, the 21petitioner must file an intent to recall with the appropriate 22local election authority. Such filing shall contain the name 23of the petitioner requesting the recall, the school board   HB2635- 2 -LRB104 09662 LNS 19728 b1member to be recalled, and the reason for the recall. 2Circulation of petitions may only begin after the filing of 3the intent to recall. The recall petitions shall follow the 4same general format as petitions for running for office, but 5shall include the words "RECALL PETITION" on the top of each 6form, with the reason for the recall also printed on the form.7    An intent to recall may be filed any time after a school 8board member has been in office for more than one year. Recall 9petitions may be circulated only from 120 to 180 days before a 10consolidated election and after the intent to recall has been 11filed. Petitions may be filed anytime from 120 to 180 days 12before a consolidated election.13    (c) All recall elections under this Act shall be conducted 14during consolidated elections. The ballot question on the 15recall shall read as follows:16        Shall (name of school board member) be recalled from 17    (his or her) position as (title of position)? (YES/NO)18        If (name of school board member) is recalled, whom do 19    you vote for to replace (him or her)?20        (Name of school board member).21        (Name of candidate).22        (Name of candidate).23    (d) Replacement candidates wishing to be listed on the 24recall ballot shall be certified under the same procedures as 25if they were running for the school board in a standard 26consolidated election, except that the petition circulation   HB2635- 3 -LRB104 09662 LNS 19728 b1and filing of petitions shall be only from the time the intent 2to recall is filed to 90 days before the election. Candidates 3running to replace the recalled school board member shall 4state clearly on their petitions which school board member the 5candidates are seeking to replace.6    (e) There shall be no primary or runoff election after a 7recall election. The person with the most votes in the recall 8election shall replace the school board member that was 9recalled.10    (f) The procedure to be certified to run in the recall 11election shall be the same as being nominated and certified in 12the standard consolidated election for the office to be 13filled. Challenges to recall petitions shall follow the same 14procedures as challenges to petitions under the Election Code.15    (g) If multiple school board members from the same school 16district are being recalled, each recall question must be 17asked separately. All candidates running as replacements for 18that office and the current school board members shall be on 19the ballot beneath the recall question.